Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5425.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 42-11 of the General Laws entitled "Department of Administration"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-11-22. State construction projects metrics.
(a) The state division of planning, in conjunction with the division of capital asset
management and maintenance and the office of energy resources, shall, prepare an environmental
and energy checklist for all state construction projects under the purview of the department of
administration which exceed ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in cost.
(b) The environmental and energy checklist shall consider the following issues:
(1) Coastal flooding during storm surges in one hundred (100) and five hundred (500) year
flood events on the site for the project;
(2) Other flooding during one hundred (100) and five hundred (500) year flood events on
the site for the project;
(3) Resilience of facilities at the site to coastal and other flooding during one hundred (100)
and five hundred (500) year flood events for the project;
(4) Impact of the project on flooding and stormwater management for neighboring
properties, particularly vulnerable state facilities;
(5) Alternative stormwater management strategies;
(6) Energy efficiency of the facility and any intentions to pursue leadership in energy and

environmental design (LEED) or other similar standards for the project;
(7) Any present value costs/savings/comparisons/evaluations used for heating, ventilation,
and air conditioning (HVAC) systems;
(8) Intentions and plans to use efficient, renewable or any alternative energy sources on the
project;
(9) Access to public transit, pedestrians and bicycles; and
(10) Any other environmental and energy issues that the department of administration
deems necessary, critical, and relevant to the long-term success of the project.
(c) Once created, the planning division shall make the checklist available to those persons
within the department of administration who are responsible for the management of the state
construction projects meeting the criteria set forth in subsection (b) of this section. The person
responsible for the management of the construction project shall complete the checklist and shall
sign it and certify that it will be maintained and placed with all other publicly accessible
construction project materials in accordance with applicable retention records policies.
(d) Nothing in this section shall require the checklist to be completed to the satisfaction of
the division of planning as the intent of this section is to consider the substance contained in the
checklist during the design and construction phases of a building construction project.
(e) Where possible, other branches, departments, agencies, and institutions of the state shall
create and consider a similar checklist where applicable.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001545
========
LC001545 - Page 2 of 3